Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 2. Societies

§ 26-29-201.
Fraternal benefit societies.

Any incorporated society, order or supreme lodge, without capital stock, including one exempted under W.S. 26-29-238(a)(ii), whether incorporated or not, conducted solely for the benefit of its members and their beneficiaries and not for profit, operated on a lodge system with ritualistic form of work, having a representative form of government, and which provides benefits in accordance with this chapter, is hereby declared to be a fraternal benefit society.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 26-29-202.
Lodge system.

A society is operating on the lodge system if it has a supreme governing body and subordinate lodges into which members are elected, initiated or admitted in accordance with its laws, rules and ritual. Subordinate lodges shall be required by the laws of the society to hold regular meetings at least once in each month in furtherance of the purposes of the society.

A society may, at its option, organize and operate lodges for children under the minimum age for adult membership. Membership and initiation in local lodges shall not be required of those children, and they shall not have a voice or vote in the management of the society.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 26-29-203.
Representative form of government.

A society has a representative form of government when:

It has a supreme governing body constituted in one of the following ways:

The supreme governing body is an assembly composed of delegates elected directly by the members or at intermediate assemblies or conventions of members or their representatives, together with other delegates as may be prescribed in the society’s laws. A society may provide for election of delegates by mail. The elected delegates shall constitute a majority in number and shall not have less than a majority of the votes and shall have not less than two-thirds (2/3) of the vote and not less than the number of votes required to amend the society’s laws. The assembly shall be elected and shall meet at least once every four (4) years and shall elect a board of directors to conduct the business of the society between meetings of the assembly. Vacancies on the board of directors between elections may be filled in the manner prescribed by the society’s laws;

The supreme governing body is a board composed of persons elected by the members, either directly or by their representatives in intermediate assemblies, and any other persons prescribed in the society’s laws. A society may provide for election of the board by mail. Each term of a board member may not exceed four (4) years. Vacancies on the board between elections may be filled in the manner prescribed by the society’s laws. Those persons elected to the board shall constitute a majority in number and not less than the number of votes required to amend the society’s laws. A person filling the unexpired term of an elected board member shall be considered to be an elected member. The board shall meet at least quarterly to conduct the business of the society.

The officers of the society are elected either by the supreme governing body or by the board of directors;

Only benefit members are eligible for election to the supreme governing body, the board of directors or any intermediate assembly; and

Each voting member shall have one (1) vote, and no vote may be cast by proxy.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-29-204.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Benefit contract” means the agreement for provision of benefits authorized by W.S.

26-29-216

, as that agreement is described in W.S. 26-29-219(a);

“Benefit member” means an adult member who is designated by the laws or rules of the society to be a benefit member under a benefit contract;

“Certificate” means the document issued as written evidence of the benefit contract;

“Laws” means the society’s articles of incorporation, constitution and bylaws, however designated;

“Lodge” means subordinate member units of the society, known as camps, courts, councils, branches or by any other designations;

“Premiums” means premiums, rates, dues or other required contributions by whatever name known, which are payable under the certificate;

“Rules” means all rules, regulations or resolutions adopted by the supreme governing body or board of directors which are intended to have general application to the members of the society;

“Society” means fraternal benefit society, unless otherwise indicated.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-29-205.
Purposes and powers.

A society shall operate for the benefit of members and their beneficiaries by:

Providing benefits as specified in W.S.

26-29-216

; and

Operating for one (1) or more social, intellectual, educational, charitable, benevolent, moral, fraternal, patriotic or religious purposes for the benefit of its members, which may also be extended to others.

The purposes of a society may be carried out directly by the society, or indirectly through subsidiary corporations or affiliated organizations.

Every society shall have the power to adopt laws and rules for the government of the society, the admission of its members and the management of its affairs. It shall have the power to change, alter, add to or amend those laws and rules and shall have other powers as are necessary and incidental to carrying into effect the objects and purposes of the society.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 26-29-206.
Qualifications for membership.

A society shall specify in its laws or rules:

Eligibility standards for each and every class of membership, provided that if benefits are provided on the lives of children, the minimum age for adult membership shall be set at not less than age fifteen (15) and not greater than age twenty-one (21);

The process for admission to membership for each membership class; and

The rights and privileges of each membership class, provided that only benefit members shall have the right to vote on the management of the insurance affairs of the society.

A society may also admit social members who shall have no voice or vote in the management of the insurance affairs of the society.

Membership rights in the society are personal to the member and are not assignable.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 26-29-207.
Location of office; meetings; communications to members; grievance procedures.

The principal office of any domestic society shall be located in this state. The meetings of its supreme governing body may be held in any state, district, province or territory in which the society has at least five (5) subordinate lodges. All business transacted at those meetings shall be as valid in all respects as if the meetings were held in this state. The minutes of the proceedings of the supreme governing body and of the board of directors shall be in the English language.

A society may provide in its laws for an official publication in which any notice, report or statement required by law to be given to members, including notice of election, may be published. These required reports, notices and statements shall be printed conspicuously in the publication. If the records of a society show that two (2) or more members have the same mailing address, an official publication mailed to one (1) member is deemed to be mailed to all members at the same address unless a member requests a separate copy.

Not later than June 1 of each year, a synopsis of the society’s annual statement providing an explanation of the facts concerning the condition of the society thereby disclosed shall be printed and mailed to each benefit member of the society or, in lieu thereof, the synopsis may be published in the society’s official publication.

A society may provide in its laws or rules for grievance or complaint procedures for members.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 26-29-208.
No personal liability.

The officers and members of the supreme governing body or any subordinate body of a society shall not be personally liable for any benefits provided by a society.

Any person may be indemnified and reimbursed by any society for expenses reasonably incurred by, and liabilities imposed upon, the person in connection with or arising out of any action, suit or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative or investigative, or threat thereof, in which the person may be involved by reason of the fact that he is or was a director, officer, employee or agent of the society or of any firm, corporation or organization which he served in any capacity at the request of the society. Unless the person acted in good faith for a purpose the person reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the society and, in a criminal action or proceeding, in addition, had no reasonable cause to believe that his conduct was unlawful, a person shall not be so indemnified or reimbursed:

In relation to any matter in an action, suit or proceeding as to which he shall finally be adjudged to be or have been guilty of breach of a duty as a director, officer, employee or agent of the society; or

In relation to any matter in an action, suit or proceeding, or threat thereof, which has been made the subject of a compromise settlement.

The determination whether the conduct of a person met the standard required in order to justify indemnification and reimbursement in relation to any matter described in paragraph (b)(i) or (ii) of this section may only be made by the supreme governing body or board of directors by a majority vote of a quorum consisting of persons who were not parties to the action, suit or proceeding or by a court of competent jurisdiction. The termination of any action, suit or proceeding by judgment, order, settlement, conviction, or upon a plea of no contest, as to the person shall not in itself create a conclusive presumption that the person did not meet the standard of conduct required in order to justify indemnification and reimbursement. The foregoing right of indemnification and reimbursement shall not be exclusive of other rights to which the person may be entitled as a matter of law and shall inure to the benefit of his heirs, executors and administrators.

A society may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any person who is or was a director, officer, employee or agent of the society, or who is or was serving at the request of the society as a director, officer, employee or agent of any other firm, corporation or organization against any liability asserted against the person and incurred by him in any official capacity or arising out of his status as enumerated above, whether or not the society would have the power to indemnify the person against the liability under this section.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 26-29-209.
Waiver.

The laws of the society may provide that no subordinate body or any of its subordinate officers or members shall have the power or authority to waive any of the provisions of the laws of the society. This provision shall be binding on the society and every member and beneficiary of a member.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 26-29-210.
Organization.

Ten (10) or more citizens of the United States, a majority of whom are citizens of this state, who desire to form a fraternal benefit society, may make, sign and acknowledge before some officer competent to take acknowledgement of deeds, articles of incorporation, in which shall be stated:

The proposed corporate name of the society, which shall not so closely resemble the name of any society or insurance company as to be misleading or confusing;

The purposes for which it is being formed and the mode in which its corporate powers are to be exercised. The purposes shall not include more liberal powers than are granted by this chapter;

The names and residences of the incorporators and the names, residences and official titles of all the officers, trustees, directors or other persons who are to have and exercise the general control of the management of the affairs and funds of the society for the first year or until the ensuing election at which all officers shall be elected by the supreme governing body, which election shall be held not later than one (1) year from the date of issuance of the permanent certificate of authority.

The articles of incorporation, duly certified copies of the society’s bylaws and rules, copies of all proposed forms of certificates, applications therefor, and circulars to be issued by the society and a bond conditioned upon the return to applicants of the advanced payments if the organization is not completed within one (1) year shall be filed with the commissioner, who may require further information as the commissioner deems necessary. The bond with sureties approved by the commissioner shall be in an amount, not less than three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000.00) nor more than one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000.00), as required by the commissioner. All documents filed are to be in the English language. If the purposes of the society conform to the requirements of this chapter and all provisions of the law have been complied with, the commissioner shall so certify, retain and file the articles of incorporation and furnish the incorporators a preliminary certificate of authority authorizing the society to solicit members as hereinafter provided.

No preliminary certificate of authority granted under the provisions of this section shall be valid after one (1) year from its date or after an additional period, not exceeding one (1) year, as may be authorized by the commissioner upon cause shown, unless the five hundred (500) applicants required in subsection (d) of this section have been secured and the organization has been completed as provided in this chapter. The articles of incorporation and all other proceedings thereunder shall become null and void in one (1) year from the date of the preliminary certificate of authority, or at the expiration of the extended period, unless the society has completed its organization and received a certificate of authority to do business as provided in this chapter.

Upon receipt of a preliminary certificate of authority from the commissioner, the society may solicit members for the purpose of completing its organization, shall collect from each applicant the amount of not less than one (1) regular monthly premium in accordance with its table of rates, and shall issue to each applicant a receipt for the amount so collected. No society shall incur any liability other than for the return of the advance premium, nor issue any certificate, nor pay, allow or offer or promise to pay or allow, any benefit to any person until:

Actual bona fide applications for benefits have been secured on not less than five hundred (500) applicants, and any necessary evidence of insurability has been furnished to and approved by the society;

At least ten (10) subordinate lodges have been established into which the five hundred (500) applicants have been admitted;

There has been submitted to the commissioner, under oath of the president or secretary, or corresponding officer of the society, a list of applicants, giving their names, addresses, date each was admitted, name and number of the subordinate lodge of which each applicant is a member, amount of benefits to be granted and premiums therefor; and

The commissioner receives a sworn statement of the treasurer, or corresponding officer of the society, that at least five hundred (500) applicants have each paid in cash at least one (1) regular monthly premium, which premiums in the aggregate shall amount to at least one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00). The advance premiums shall be held in trust during the period of organization and if the society has not qualified for a certificate of authority within one (1) year, the premiums shall be returned to the applicants.

The commissioner may make an examination and require further information as he deems advisable. Upon presentation of satisfactory evidence that the society has complied with all the provisions of law, the commissioner shall issue to the society a certificate of authority to that effect and that the society is authorized to transact business pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. The certificate of authority shall be prima facie evidence of the existence of the society at the date of the certificate. The commissioner shall cause a record of the certificate of authority to be made. A certified copy of the record may be given in evidence with like effect as the original certificate of authority.

Any incorporated society authorized to transact business in this state at the time this act becomes effective shall not be required to reincorporate.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

Society may offer mutual funds to its members. —

Absent a finding of jeopardized solvency or integrity as an insurer and absent a showing that it is avoiding proper taxes, a fraternal benefit society does not exceed its limited powers by offering mutual funds to its members. Langdon v. Lutheran Bhd., 625 P.2d 209,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 309

(Wyo. 1981) (decided under prior law).

§ 26-29-211.
Amendments to laws.

A domestic society may amend its laws in accordance with the provisions thereof by action of its supreme governing body at any regular or special meeting thereof or, if its laws so provide, by referendum. The referendum may be held in accordance with the provisions of its laws by the vote of delegates or representatives of voting members or by the vote of local lodges. A society may provide for voting by mail. No amendment submitted for adoption by referendum shall be adopted unless, within six (6) months from the date of the submission thereof, a majority of the members voting shall have signified their consent to the amendment by one (1) of the methods specified in this chapter.

No amendment to the laws of any domestic society shall take effect unless approved by the commissioner who shall approve the amendment if the commissioner finds that it has been properly adopted and is not inconsistent with any requirement of the laws of this state or with the character, objects and purposes of the society. Unless the commissioner expressly disapproves any amendment within sixty (60) days after the filing of the amendment, the amendment shall be considered approved. The approval or disapproval of the commissioner shall be in writing and mailed to the secretary or corresponding officer of the society at its principal office. In case the commissioner disapproves the amendment, the reasons therefor shall be stated in the written notice.

Within ninety (90) days from the approval thereof by the commissioner, all amendments, or a synopsis thereof, shall be furnished to all members of the society either by mail or by publication in full in the official publication of the society. The affidavit of any officer of the society or of anyone authorized by it to mail any amendments or synopsis thereof, stating facts which show that the amendments or a synopsis thereof have been addressed and mailed, shall be prima facie evidence that the amendments or synopsis thereof, have been furnished the addressee.

Every foreign or alien society authorized to do business in this state shall file with the commissioner a certified copy of all amendments of, or additions to, its laws within ninety (90) days after the enactment of the amendments or additions to its laws.

Printed copies of the laws as amended, certified by the secretary or corresponding officer of the society shall be prima facie evidence of the legal adoption thereof.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 26-29-212.
Institutions.

A society may create, maintain and operate, or may establish organizations to operate, not for profit institutions to further the purposes permitted by W.S. 26-29-205(a)(ii). The institutions may furnish services free or at a reasonable charge. Any real or personal property owned, held or leased by the society for this purpose shall be reported in every annual statement, but shall not be allowed as an admitted society asset. No society shall own or operate funeral homes or undertaking establishments.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 26-29-213.
Reinsurance.

A domestic society may, by a reinsurance agreement, cede any individual risk or risks in whole or in part to an insurer, other than another fraternal benefit society, having the power to make reinsurance and authorized to do business in this state, or if not so authorized, one which is approved by the commissioner, but no domestic society may reinsure substantially all of its insurance in force without the written permission of the commissioner. It may take credit for the reserves on ceded risks to the extent reinsured, but no credit shall be allowed as an admitted asset or as a deduction from liability, to a ceding society for reinsurance made, ceded, renewed or otherwise becoming effective after the effective date of this act, unless the reinsurance is payable by the assuming insurer on the basis of the liability of the ceding society under the contract or contracts reinsured without diminution because of the insolvency of the ceding society.

Notwithstanding the limitation in subsection (a) of this section, a society may reinsure the risks of another society in a consolidation or merger approved by the commissioner under W.S.

26-29-214

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 26-29-214.
Consolidations and mergers.

A domestic society may consolidate or merge with any other society by complying with the provisions of this section. It shall file with the commissioner:

A certified copy of the written contract containing in full the terms and conditions of the consolidation or merger;

A sworn statement by the president and secretary or corresponding officers of each society showing the financial condition thereof on a date fixed by the commissioner but not earlier than December 31 next preceding the date of the contract;

A certificate of the officers, verified by their respective oaths, that the consolidation or merger has been approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the supreme governing body of each society, the vote being conducted at a regular or special meeting of each supreme governing body, or, if the society’s laws permit, by mail; and

Evidence that at least sixty (60) days prior to the action of the supreme governing body of each society, the text of the contract has been furnished to all members of each society either by mail or by publication in full in the official publication of each society.

If the commissioner finds that the contract conforms with this section, that the financial statements are correct and that the consolidation or merger is just and equitable to the members of each society, the commissioner shall approve the contract and issue a certificate to that effect. Upon approval, the contract shall be in full force and effect unless any society which is a party to the contract is incorporated under the laws of any other state or territory. In that event the consolidation or merger shall not become effective unless and until it has been approved as provided by the laws of that state or territory and a certificate of approval filed with the commissioner of this state or, if the laws of the state or territory contain no applicable provision, then the consolidation or merger shall not become effective unless and until it has been approved by the commissioner of that state or territory and certificate of approval filed with the commissioner of this state. In case the contract is not approved it shall be inoperative, and the fact of the submission and its contents shall not be disclosed by the commissioner.

Upon consolidation or merger becoming effective as herein provided, all the rights, franchises and interests of the consolidated or merged societies in and to every species of property, real, personal or mixed, and things in action shall be vested in the society resulting from or remaining after the consolidation or merger without any other instrument, except that conveyances of real property may be evidenced by proper deeds, and the title to any real estate or interest therein, vested under the laws of this state in any of the societies consolidated or merged, shall not revert or be in any way impaired by reason of the consolidation or merger, but shall vest absolutely in the society resulting from or remaining after such consolidation or merger.

The affidavit of any officer of the society or of anyone authorized by it to mail any notice or document, stating that the notice or document has been addressed and mailed, shall be prima facie evidence that the notice or document has been furnished the addressees.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 26-29-215.
Conversion of fraternal benefit society into mutual life insurance company.

Any domestic fraternal benefit society may be converted and licensed as a mutual life insurance company by compliance with all the requirements of the general insurance laws for mutual life insurance companies. A plan of conversion shall be prepared in writing by the board of directors setting forth in full the terms and conditions of conversion. The affirmative vote of two-thirds (2/3) of all members of the supreme governing body at a regular or special meeting is necessary for the approval of the plan. No conversion shall take effect unless and until approved by the commissioner who may give approval if the commissioner finds that the proposed change is in conformity with the requirements of law and not prejudicial to the certificate holders of the society.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 26-29-216.
Benefits.

A society may provide the following contractual benefits in any form:

Death benefits;

Endowment benefits;

Annuity benefits;

Temporary or permanent disability benefits;

Hospital, medical or nursing benefits;

Monument or tombstone benefits to the memory of deceased members; and

Other benefits as authorized for life insurers and which are not inconsistent with this chapter.

A society shall specify in its rules those persons who may be issued, or covered by, the contractual benefits in subsection (a) of this section, consistent with providing benefits to members and their dependents. A society may provide benefits on the lives of children under the minimum age for adult membership upon application of an adult person.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 26-29-217.
Beneficiaries.

The owner of a benefit contract shall have the right at all times to change the beneficiary or beneficiaries in accordance with the laws or rules of the society unless the owner waives this right by specifically requesting in writing that the beneficiary designation be irrevocable. A society may, through its laws or rules, limit the scope of beneficiary designations and shall provide that no revocable beneficiary shall have or obtain any vested interest in the proceeds of any certificate until the certificate has become due and payable in conformity with the provisions of the benefit contract.

A society may provide for the payment of funeral benefits to the extent of the portion of any payment under a certificate as might reasonably appear to be due to any person equitably entitled thereto by reason of having incurred expense occasioned by the burial of the member, provided the payment shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00).

If, at the death of any member, there is no lawful beneficiary to whom the insurance benefits are payable, the amount of the benefits, except to the extent that funeral benefits may be paid as provided in subsection (b) of this section, shall be payable to the personal representative of the deceased insured, provided that if the owner of the certificate is other than the insured, the proceeds shall be payable to the owner.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 26-29-218.
Benefits not attachable.

No money or other benefit, charity, relief or aid to be paid, provided or rendered by any society, shall be liable to attachment, garnishment or other process, or to be seized, taken, appropriated or applied by any legal or equitable process or operation of law to pay any debt or liability of a member or beneficiary, or any other person who may have a right thereunder, either before or after payment by the society.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 26-29-219.
Benefit contract.

Every society authorized to do business in this state shall issue to each owner of a benefit contract a certificate specifying the amount of benefits provided thereby. The certificate, together with any riders or endorsements attached thereto, the laws of the society, the application for membership, the application for insurance and declaration of insurability, if any, signed by the applicant, and all amendments thereto, shall constitute the benefit contract, as of the date of issuance, between the society and the owner, and the certificate shall so state. A copy of the application for insurance and declaration of insurability, if any, shall be endorsed upon or attached to the certificate. All statements on the application shall be representations and not warranties. Any waiver of this provision shall be void.

Any changes, additions or amendments to the laws of the society duly made or enacted subsequent to the issuance of the certificate, shall bind the owner and the beneficiaries, and shall govern and control the benefit contract in all respects the same as though the changes, additions or amendments had been made prior to and were in force at the time of the application for insurance, except that no change, addition or amendments shall destroy or diminish benefits which the society contracted to give the owner as of the date of issuance.

Any person upon whose life a benefit contract is issued prior to attaining the age of majority shall be bound by the terms of the application and certificate and by all the laws and rules of the society to the same extent as though the age of majority had been attained at the time of application.

A society shall provide in its laws that if its reserves as to all or any class of certificates become impaired its board of directors or corresponding body may require that there shall be paid by the owner to the society the amount of the owner’s equitable proportion of the deficiency as ascertained by its board, and that if the payment is not made:

It shall stand as an indebtedness against the certificate and draw interest not to exceed the rate specified for certificate loans under the certificates; or

In lieu of or in combination with paragraph (i) of this subsection, the owner may accept a proportionate reduction in benefits under the certificate.

The society may specify the manner of the election and which alternative is to be presumed if no election is made pursuant to subsection (d) of this section.

Copies of any of the documents specified in this section, certified by the secretary or corresponding officer of the society, shall be received in evidence of the terms and conditions thereof.

No certificate shall be delivered or issued for delivery in this state unless a copy of the form has been filed with and approved by the commissioner in the manner provided for like policies issued by life insurers in this state. Every life, accident, health or disability insurance certificate and every annuity certificate issued on or after one (1) year from the effective date of this act shall meet the standard contract provision requirements not inconsistent with this chapter for like policies issued by life insurers in this state, except that a society may provide for a grace period for payment of premiums of one (1) full month in its certificates. The certificate shall also contain a provision stating the amount of premiums which are payable under the certificate and a provision reciting or setting forth the substance of any sections of the society’s laws or rules in force at the time of issuance of the certificate which, if violated, will result in the termination or reduction of benefits payable under the certificate. If the laws of the society provide for expulsion or suspension of a member, the certificate shall also contain a provision that any member so expelled or suspended, except for nonpayment of a premium or within the contestable period for material misrepresentation in the application for membership or insurance, shall have the privilege of maintaining the certificate in force by continuing payment of the required premium.

Benefit contracts issued on the lives of persons below the society’s minimum age for adult membership may provide for transfer of control of ownership to the insured at an age specified in the certificate. A society may require approval of an application for membership in order to effect this transfer, and may provide in all other respects for the regulation, government and control of the certificates and all rights, obligations and liabilities incident thereto and connected therewith. Ownership rights prior to the transfer shall be specified in the certificate.

A society may specify the terms and conditions on which benefit contracts may be assigned.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to age of majority and rights upon emancipation, see §

14-1-101

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-29-220.
Nonforfeiture benefits; cash surrender values; certificate loans and other options.

For certificates issued prior to one (1) year after the effective date of this act, the value of every paid-up nonforfeiture benefit and the amount of any cash surrender value, loan or other option granted shall comply with the provisions of law applicable on December 31, 1989.

For certificates issued on or after one (1) year from the effective date of this act for which reserves are computed on the Commissioner’s 1941 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table, the Commissioner’s 1941 Standard Industrial Table or the Commissioner’s 1958 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table, or the Commissioner’s 1980 Standard Mortality Table, or any more recent table made applicable to life insurers, every paid-up nonforfeiture benefit and the amount of any cash surrender value, loan or other option granted shall not be less than the corresponding amount ascertained in accordance with the laws of this state applicable to life insurers issuing policies containing like benefits based upon such tables.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 26-29-221.
Investments.

A society shall invest its funds only in investments authorized by Wyoming statutes for the investment of assets of life insurers and subject to the limitations thereon. Any foreign or alien society permitted or seeking to do business in this state which invests its funds in accordance with the laws of the state, district, territory, country or province in which it is incorporated, shall be held to meet the requirements of this section for the investment of funds.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 26-29-222.
Funds.

All assets shall be held, invested and disbursed for the use and benefit of the society and no member or beneficiary shall have or acquire individual rights therein or become entitled to any apportionment on the surrender of any part thereof, except as provided in the benefit contract.

A society may create, maintain, invest, disburse and apply any special fund or funds necessary to carry out any purpose permitted by laws of such society.

A society may, pursuant to resolution of its supreme governing body, establish and operate one (1) or more separate accounts and issue contracts on a variable basis, subject to the provisions of law regulating life insurers establishing such accounts and issuing such contracts. To the extent the society deems it necessary in order to comply with any applicable federal or state laws, or any rules issued thereunder, the society may adopt special procedures for the conduct of the business and affairs of a separate account, may, for persons having beneficial interests therein, provide special voting and other rights, including without limitation special rights and procedures relating to investment policy, investment advisory services, selection of certified public accountants, and selection of a committee to manage the business and affairs of the account, and may issue contracts on a variable basis to which W.S. 26-29-219(b) and (d) shall not apply.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 26-29-223.
Exemptions.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, societies shall be governed by this chapter and shall be exempt from all other provisions of the general insurance laws of this state unless they be expressly designated therein, or unless it is specifically made applicable by this chapter.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 26-29-224.
Exemption from taxation.

Every society organized or licensed under this chapter is hereby declared to be a charitable and benevolent institution, and all of its funds shall be exempt from all and every state, county, district, municipal and school tax other than taxes on real estate.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 26-29-225.
Valuation.

Standards of valuation for certificates issued prior to one (1) year after the effective date of this act shall be those provided by the laws applicable on December 31, 1989.

The minimum standards of valuation for certificates issued on or after one (1) year from the effective date of this act shall be based on the following tables:

For certificates of life insurance, the Commissioner’s 1941 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table, the Commissioner’s 1941 Standard Industrial Mortality Table, the Commissioner’s 1958 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table, the Commissioner’s 1980 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table or any more recent table made applicable to life insurers;

For annuity and pure endowment certificates, for total and permanent disability benefits, for accidental death benefits and for noncancelable accident and health benefits, tables authorized for use by life insurers in this state.

All of the standards provided in subsection (b) of this section shall be under valuation methods and standards, including interest assumptions, in accordance with the laws of this state applicable to life insurers issuing policies containing like benefits.

The commissioner may, in his discretion, accept other standards for valuation if the commissioner finds that the reserves produced thereby will not be less in the aggregate than reserves computed in accordance with the minimum valuation standard prescribed in this section. The commissioner may, in his discretion, vary the standards of mortality applicable to all benefit contracts on substandard lives or other extrahazardous lives by any society authorized to do business in this state.

Any society, with the consent of the commissioner of the state of domicile of the society and under conditions, if any, which the commissioner may impose, may establish and maintain reserves on its certificates in excess of the reserves required thereunder, but the contractual rights of any benefit member shall not be affected thereby.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 3, makes the act effective on January 1, 1990.